Hawaii statutes.
[§551E‑34] Real property. Unless
the power of attorney otherwise provides, language in a power of attorney
granting general authority with respect to real property shall authorize the
agent to:

(1) Demand, buy, lease, receive, accept as a gift or
as security for an extension of credit, or otherwise acquire or reject an
interest in real property or a right incident to real property;

(2) Sell; exchange; convey with or without covenants,
representations, or warranties; quitclaim; release; surrender; retain title for
security; encumber; partition; consent to partitioning; subject to an easement
or covenant; subdivide; apply for zoning or other governmental permits; plat or
consent to platting; develop; grant an option concerning; lease; sublease;
contribute to an entity in exchange for an interest in that entity; or
otherwise grant or dispose of an interest in real property or a right incident
to real property;

(3) Pledge or mortgage an interest in real property
or right incident to real property as security to borrow money or pay, renew,
or extend the time of payment of a debt of the principal or a debt guaranteed
by the principal;

(4) Release, assign, satisfy, or enforce by
litigation or otherwise a mortgage, deed of trust, conditional sale contract,
encumbrance, lien, or other claim to real property that exists or is asserted;

(5) Manage or conserve an interest in real property
or a right incident to real property owned or claimed to be owned by the
principal, including by:

(A) Insuring against liability or casualty or
other loss;

(B) Obtaining or regaining possession of or
protecting the interest or right by litigation or otherwise;

(C) Paying, assessing, compromising, or
contesting taxes or assessments or applying for and receiving refunds in connection
with them; and

(D) Purchasing supplies, hiring assistance or
labor, and making repairs or alterations to the real property;

(6) Use, develop, alter, replace, remove, erect, or
install structures or other improvements upon real property in or incident to
which the principal has, or claims to have, an interest or right;

(7) Participate in a reorganization with respect to
real property or an entity that owns an interest in or right incident to real
property and receive, hold, and act with respect to stocks and bonds or other
property received in a plan of reorganization, including by:

(A) Selling or otherwise disposing of them;

(B) Exercising or selling an option, right of
conversion, or similar right with respect to them; and

(C) Exercising any voting rights in person or
by proxy;

(8) Change the form of title of an interest in or
right incident to real property; and

(9) Dedicate to public use, with or without
consideration, easements or other real property in which the principal has, or
claims to have, an interest. [L 2014, c 22, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next